Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-103.03
Beer, defined.

Beer means a beverage obtained by alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or concoction of barley or other grain, malt, and hops in water and includes, but is not limited to, beer, ale, stout, lager beer, porter, near beer, flavored malt beverage, and hard cider.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB824, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 4.